Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 9

Public Works

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References.

County judge not to be interested party in contracts concerning public buildings, §16-15-110.

Projects exceeding two million dollars, §14-58-1001.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1939, No. 335, § 4: approved Mar. 16, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “That in order to safeguard life, health and property, and to promote welfare, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.”

Acts 1971, No. 104, § 4: Feb. 17, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that greater control should be exercised over the expenditures of cash funds by agencies, departments and institutions of the state for construction purposes; that this act is designed to provide such controls and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 273, § 3: Feb. 28, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that greater control should be exercised over the expenditures of cash funds by agencies, departments and institutions of the state for construction purposes; that this act is designed to provide such controls and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 5 and 12, § 5: Mar. 19, 2018. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the efficient design and construction of unpaved trail projects on property of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission will increase economic development in the state; that certain regulatory requirements have delayed unpaved trail projects in the state; that it is in the best interest of the state to remove certain regulatory burdens on these unpaved trail projects; and that the immediate implementation of this act will allow for the expedited design and construction of these unpaved trail projects and improve economic development across the state through the ability to immediately improve Arkansas's state parks and increase tourism. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-9-101. Observation by registered professionals required.

(a)

The state or a township, county, municipality, village, or other political subdivision of the state shall not engage in the capital improvement of public works involving engineering or architecture for which the plans, specifications, and estimates have not been made by and the capital improvement executed under the observation of a professional engineer as defined in §17-30-101 or architect as defined in §17-15-102, in their respective areas of expertise.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall be held to apply to any public works wherein the contemplated capital improvement expenditure:

(1)

For an engineering project does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); or

(2)

For an architectural project does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c)

This section does not apply to:

(1)

A school district, county, municipality, or township project that is planned and executed according to plans and specifications furnished by authorized state agencies; or

(2)(A)

The design or construction of an unpaved trail project as defined under §22-2-102.

(B)

The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission shall ensure that an unpaved trail project created under this subdivision (c)(2) meets the standards for observation by registered professionals as established by the Building Authority Division.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 335, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 321, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-601, 14-602; Acts 1993, No. 284, § 1; 1995, No. 1108, § 3; 2007, No. 471, § 1; 2011, No. 897, § 16; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 4; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 6235.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment, in (a), substituted “a professional engineer as defined in §17-30-101 or architect as defined in §17-15-102” for “a registered professional engineer or architect” and deleted “who are licensed to practice under the laws of Arkansas” following “areas of expertise”.

The 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 5 and 12 redesignated former (c) as the introductory language of (c) and (c)(1); substituted “does” for “shall” in the introductory language of (c); and added (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (c)(2)(B).

22-9-102. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning employment of Arkansas citizens, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 645, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1933, No. 261, §§ 1-4; Pope's Dig., §§ 8533-8536; Acts 1941, No. 421, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-607 — 14-610.

22-9-103. Authorization for state agency to commit cash funds for construction — Penalty.

(a)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any agency, department, or institution supported by state-appropriated funds or cash funds to expend any cash funds of the agency for the construction of a building or to incur any obligation committing or pledging the cash funds of the agency for the construction of a building unless the agency, department, or institution has previously obtained specific authorization by legislative enactment for the construction of the building to be paid, wholly or in part, from cash funds of the agency.

(2)

If the agency does not have specific legislative authority to construct a building from cash funds, the agency, department, or institution shall first obtain specific legislative authorization for the construction of the building prior to the expending of any cash funds of the agency, or prior to entering into any contract or agreement with respect to constructing any building to be paid from cash funds of the agency.

(b)

In the interim between legislative sessions, authorization for the construction of buildings and for the expending of cash funds of the agency therefor may be given by the Governor, in writing.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall apply to public school districts.

(d)

Any board, commission, or authorized head of any agency, department, or institution which shall expend any cash funds of the agency in violation of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of malfeasance in office and shall be removed therefrom.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 104, §§ 1-3; 1977, No. 273, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-649 — 14-651.

22-9-104. Proposed capital expenditures — Definition.

(a)

Prior to the convening of regular sessions of the General Assembly, each state agency, department, or institution shall submit a proposed capital expenditures request which shall:

(1)

Identify each public works construction project proposed to be constructed or obligated by construction contract by the governmental body during the next biennial period of the state;

(2)

Indicate a method of financing the construction through state appropriation, federal grants, revenue bonds, or revenue notes provided by law, the use of agency or institutional receipts, the use of donated funds from private sources, or a combination of one (1) or more such sources; and

(3)

Be accompanied by estimates of the cost of maintaining and operating the capital improvement facility once constructed.

(b)

After appropriate hearings and review, the General Assembly shall designate each proposed capital expenditure for construction which has been approved and the method of financing the proposed capital expenditure.

(c)

Proposed capital expenditure projects shall not be undertaken until approved by the General Assembly.

(d)(1)

In unusual circumstances between sessions of the General Assembly, a state agency, department, or institution which needs to make a capital expenditure in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), which has not been approved by the General Assembly, may submit a request for the expenditure to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, who shall review the request and submit his or her recommendation for the method of finance for the expenditure to the Legislative Council for its advice and recommendation.

(2)

Upon obtaining the advice and recommendation of the Legislative Council, the state agency, department, or institution is authorized to proceed with the capital expenditure, subject to the provisions of the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §19-4-101 et seq., and other fiscal laws of the state.

(e)

As used in this section, “public works construction project” means the purchase or construction of all lands, buildings, structures, utility systems, and similar facilities for the use of the governmental body filing the request but shall not include projects involving less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(f)

Nothing in this section shall apply to public school districts.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 104, § 3; 1977, No. 273, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-651; Acts 1999, No. 776, § 1.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment substituted “two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” in (d)(1) and (e); deleted “or the mere repair, alteration, or renovation of facilities” at the end of (e); and made stylistic changes.

22-9-105. Poor contractual performance — Additional bids prohibited.

(a)(1)

A firm that has an existing state contract with a state agency shall not bid on any additional state contracts with a state agency if the firm's existing state contract with a state agency has one (1) or more material issues, including without limitation a material delay in the commencement or completion of a project or a breach of contract.

(2)(A)

If a state agency determines that an existing state contract with a firm has one (1) or more material issues under this section, the firm may appeal the state agency's determination to the State Procurement Director.

(B)

The decision of the director regarding an appeal under this subsection is final and conclusive.

(C)

The director shall adopt rules to establish the process and procedure for appeals under this subsection.

(b)

As used in this section, “state agency” means the same as defined in §22-2-102.

(c)

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall adopt rules to provide guidance on what is considered to be a material issue under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 422, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Award of Contracts

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1949, No. 159, § 6: approved Feb. 23, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “Since numerous complaints have been made with regard to the manner of letting contracts for construction for the state and local taxing units and it being the belief that passage of this act will result in substantial savings of money to the public, and the possibility of unethical practices will be materially eliminated and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1957, No. 183, § 2: Mar. 8, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the large volume of proposed construction by taxing agencies, and the confusion that now exists on a large scale because the general contractor does not have full responsibility for all the work to be performed to the detriment of all concerned, an emergency is therefore declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval by the Governor.”

Acts 1961, No. 477, § 2: Mar. 16, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that because of the large volume of proposed construction by taxing agencies and the confusion that now exists on a large scale concerning the handling of subcontractors' bids to the detriment of contractors, subcontractors, the taxing agencies and the public, the clarification made by this act is immediately needed to eliminate said confusion and resulting harmful effects on the public peace, health, safety and welfare. By reason thereof, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 135, § 4: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 3, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many contractors performing construction or repair contracts for public authorities in this state are often subject to undue and unnecessary delay in receiving payment for such contracts upon completion and acceptance thereof; that because of such unnecessary delays in making payment such contractors are subject to additional expense in borrowing funds to pay creditors which was not contemplated at the time the contract was entered into; that in most instances the delay in making payments is not due to the lack of public funds, but is merely the result of carelessness or inaction on the part of the public authority owing the claim; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to encourage public authorities to make prompt payment of such claims or to permit the contractor to recover interest on the amount unpaid to compensate him for additional expense incurred because of such delay; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 758, § 6: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that because of the large volume of proposed construction by taxing agencies and the confusion that now exists on a large scale concerning the handling of Bidding Procedures, to the detriment of contractors, subcontractors, the taxing agencies and the public, that the clarification made by this act is immediately needed to eliminate said confusion and resulting harmful effects on the public peace, health, safety and welfare. By reason thereof, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 759, § 3: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that because of the large volume of proposed construction by taxing agencies and the confusion that now exists on a large scale concerning the handling of subcontractor bids, to the detriment of contractors, subcontractors, the taxing agencies and the public, that the clarification made by this Act is immediately needed to eliminate said confusion and resulting harmful effects on the public peace, health, safety and welfare. By reason thereof, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 936, § 4: Mar. 24, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the lack of civil penalties for violations of the public contracting laws reduces the effectiveness of those laws and that the effectiveness of the laws dealing with awarding of public works contracts serves an important public purpose. Therefore, in order to increase the effectiveness of the enforcement of the public works contracting laws, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 291, § 6: Mar. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the well-being of Arkansas' craft workers are unnecessarily exposed to the hazards of trench excavation and the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to protect the health and safety of the Arkansas worker. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1229, § 8: Apr. 12, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under present law it is unclear whether public construction projects conducted by State Building Services or other State agencies are subject to the payment of local construction fees, inspection by local inspectors, local zoning laws and other local regulations; that it is urgent that this matter be clarified immediately in order to protect the State from unnecessary restrictions on State construction projects and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2005, No. 859, § 5: Mar. 15, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that requirements in plans and specifications which require bidders and suppliers to hold membership in certain professional organizations limit the number of eligible bidders and suppliers for projects; that by requiring bidders and suppliers to hold membership in professional organizations, an entity may increase the possibility of certain bidders and suppliers receiving projects, which is an inequitable outcome; and that the state of Arkansas and its citizens will benefit from enhanced competition for bidders and suppliers on public construction projects. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 147, § 4: Feb. 23, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an immediate need exists to allow municipal utilities to fulfill their duties to purchase commodities and enter into legal and enforceable contracts for services to maintain and operate utility facilities on federal military installations within the state; that the window of opportunity for municipalities to enter into third party contracts for maintaining and operating utility facilities serving the utility needs of federal military installations is narrow; that the effective operation of federal military installations in the state depends on the maintenance and operation of these utility facilities; and that this act is
immediately necessary because national security and the general welfare, material wellbeing, and economic stability of the citizens of this state will be furthered by this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-9-201. Applicability of §§ 22-9-202 — 22-9-204.

(a)

The provisions of §§22-9-202 —22-9-204 shall not apply to contracts awarded by the State Highway Commission for construction or maintenance of public highways, roads, or streets under the provisions of §§27-67-206 and27-67-207.

(b)

The provisions of §22-9-204 shall not apply to projects designed to provide utility needs of the state or any agency thereof, a municipality, or a county. Those projects shall include, but shall not be limited to, pipeline installation, sanitation projects, light earth work and foundation work, local flood control, sanitary landfills, drainage projects, site clearing, water lines, streets, roads, alleys, sidewalks, water channelization, light construction sewage, water works, and improvements to street and highway construction.

(c)(1)(A)

The notice and bid security provisions of §§19-4-1401,19-4-1405, and22-9-203 pertaining to the project amount and the time frames of the advertisement shall not apply to contracts for the performance of any work or the making of any capital improvements due to emergency contracting procedures.

(B)

Nothing shall prohibit the contracting authority from requiring a bid security if the contracting authority determines to require a bid security.

(2)(A)

The percentage requirements of §22-9-203(e) shall not apply to contracts for the performance of any work or the making of any capital improvements due to emergency contracting procedures.

(B)

If negotiations are unsuccessful and the contracting authority determines further negotiations with the lowest responsible bidder are not in the contracting authority's best interests, nothing shall prohibit the contracting authority from terminating negotiations and negotiating the award of the contract to the next lowest responsible bidder.

(3)

“Emergency contracting procedures” means the acquisition of services and materials for capital improvements, including without limitation acquisitions funded in whole or in part with insurance proceeds, that are in accordance with the minimum standards and criteria of the Building Authority Division.

(4)

Emergency contracting procedures may include sole sourcing or competitive quote bids.

(5)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services or a designee may make or authorize others to make emergency contracting procedures as defined in subdivision (c)(3) of this section and in accordance with the minimum standards and criteria of the division.

(d)

To the extent that federal purchasing laws or bidding preferences conflict, this subchapter does not apply to projects related to supplying water or wastewater utility services, operations, or maintenance to a federal military installation by a municipality of the state.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 159, § 5; 1977, No. 370, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-614n; Acts 1999, No. 776, § 2; 2001, No. 162, § 1; 2007, No. 471, § 2; 2011, No. 782, § 1; 2015, No. 147, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6236, 6237.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added (c).

The 2001 amendment, in (b), inserted “the state or any agency thereof,” and substituted “landfills” for “landfill” and “water lines” for “waterline”; redesignated former (c), (c)(1) and (c)(2) as present (c)(1), (c)(3) and (c)(5) respectively; inserted present (c)(2) and (c)(4); substituted “22-9-203 pertaining to the project amount and the time frames of the advertisement” for “22-9-204” in present (c)(1); and substituted “(c)(3)” for “(c)(1)” in present (c)(5).

The 2011 amendment inserted “including without limitation acquisitions funded in whole or in part with insurance proceeds” in (c)(3).

The 2015 amendment added (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (c)(3); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (c)(5).

22-9-202. Construction of this section and §§ 22-9-203 and 22-9-204.

(a)

It is the intent of this section and §§22-9-203 and22-9-204 to provide a uniform procedure that a taxing unit shall follow when work is done under formal contract.

(b)(1)

This section and §§22-9-203 and22-9-204 do not:

(A)

Prevent a taxing unit from performing any of the work or making any of the improvements referred to in this section and §§22-9-203 and22-9-204 by the use of its own employees; or

(B)

Require that bids must be received from a contractor as a condition precedent to the right to use the taxing unit's own employees.

(2)

This section and §§22-9-203 and22-9-204 do not prevent a county government from separately procuring:

(A)

Commodities in accordance with §14-22-101 et seq.;

(B)

Professional services in accordance with §19-11-801 et seq.; or

(C)

Construction work from one (1) or more separate contractors under separate contract or invoice so that the work is not included in calculating the bid requirement threshold of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(c)

This section and §§22-9-203 and22-9-204 do not amend or repeal any law that requires the publication of notice in those instances in which the estimated amount of the cost of the proposed improvements within the scope of the contract is more than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 159, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-614; Acts 2011, No. 618, § 1; 2013, No. 494, § 1; 2017, No. 725, §§ 1, 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1949, No. 159, § 5, as amended by Acts 1977, No. 370, § 2, provided that the provisions of §§22-9-202 —22-9-204 would not apply to contracts awarded by the State Highway Commission for construction or maintenance of public highways, roads, or streets under the provisions of Acts 1929, No. 65, as amended, and laws supplemental and amendatory thereto and that the provisions of §22-9-204 would not apply to projects designed to provide utility needs of a municipality or county. Those projects included, but were not limited to, pipeline installation, sanitary projects, light earth work, and foundation work, local flood control, sanitary landfill, drainage projects, site clearing, water lines, streets, roads, alleys, sidewalks, water channelization, light construction, sewage and water works, and improvements to street and highway construction.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), substituted “that” for “to be followed by,” inserted “shall follow” and deleted “to be” preceding “done”; rewrote (b); and inserted “within the scope of the contract” in (c).

The 2017 amendment substituted “thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)” in (b)(2)(C); and substituted “more than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000)” for “less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)” in (c).